training/data/hyph_fil.tex
1pos1
1pot
1pr
1pre
pro1
p1t
p1ti
1pu.
1pu1h
pu3li
pu3lis
pu3lon
pu1m
1pu1p
pupu3
pupu3l
pupu3t
1pur
pusa2
p3usap3
1put
pu3to.
1p2y
1p2ya
p2ya.
1p2ye
p2yer
1pyu1
1ra.
1ra1a
ra1b
1ra1g
1ra1h
1ral
ra3la
ra3lan
1ra1m
1ran
ra3nga
1ra1r
ra1s
ra2s.
ra1u
rawa2
4raw3ar
4rawara
ray1
2r1b
2r1be
rber2
2rbey
2r1bi1
2rbid
2r1bo
2rbok
r1d
r1di
reg1
re1l
1re1n
re1p
1re1r
1re1t
rey1
2r1g
2r1ga1
2rgan
r1h
r1he
r1hi1
r1ho
1ri.
ri2a.
1ri1d
1ri1k
ri2ly
ri1m
rime2
rimet3
1rin
ri1r
ri1t
r1k
r1ke
r1ki
r1ko
r1ku1
r1m
r1ma
rma3la
r1mi1
r1n
r1ne
r1no1
r2o
r2o.
ro1b
ro1d
rog1
r2ok
r2oka
r2ol
r2ol.
ro1m
1ro1o
ro1r
ro1t
r1p
r1po1
2r1s
r2s.
2r1sa
2rsa.
r1se
r1si1
r1so
r1sy
r1t
r1ta
r1te2
rte2b
r1ti
r1to
r1tu1
1ru1b
rug1
ru1h
ruk1
1ru1n
runu3
runu3n
ru1p
1ru1r
1rus
ru1t
r1y
r1ya
r1ye
r1yo
2s.
1sa
1sa.
1sa1a
1sab
sa4bis
sa4bisa
1sa1d
1sag
1sa1h
sa1i2
2sai2s
1sak
sa2ka3
saka3l
1sal
sa3la
sa3lap
sa3lay
1sam
samasa4
2sanm
san3t
san3to
2sap3u2
sap3us
1sa1r
sa2rb
1sas
1saw
4sa4yang
sa3yo
sa3yo.
s1b
s1bi2
sbi2l
s1d
s1da
1se
se1g
1sek
seks2
sel1
1sen
2se1p
2sepl
1ser1
se1s
1si
1si.
1sib
si2b.
1si1d
1sig
1sik
1sil
si2la
1sim1
1sin
si1r
1sis
1si2t
si2t.
si3to
si3tol
1si1y
2s1k
2ska
2s2kas
s1ke
s1ko
skop2
2s1kr
2skri
s1ku
s1l
s1la2
sla2k
s1m
s1mi
s1mo
1so
1so.
1sod
1sok
1son
so1o1
1so1p
so1s
2soy
2soy.
s1p
s1pa
s1pe
spi1
s1po1
2s1t
s2tab
s1te
2s1ti1
2stib
s1to
2s1tr
2stro
s1tu1
stud2
1su
1su.
1su1b
suba3l
1su1h
1su1k
su1m
1sun
sunda3
su3nt
su3nto
1sur1
1sus
susu3n
1su1w
1s2w
1s2wa
s2wal
swe1
1s2y
1s2ya1
s2ya.
s2yan
1sye
1syo
syona3
1syu1
2t.
1ta
1ta.
1ta1a
taa2l
ta1b
2taba
ta2bl
2tad.
1tag
tagu2
1ta1h
2tak.
ta3kb
ta3kbo
taki2
4takit
4takita
2takw
1ta1l
1ta2m
ta2ma
1tan
ta3nga
ta3no
ta3non
1tao
ta3ong
1ta1p
1tar
1tas
1tat
tata3k
1tau
1taw
2tayg
2tayp
2ta3yu2
ta3yu.
ta3yut
1te
1te.
1te2b1
te2br
1te1h
tek1
te1l
1te1m
1ten
1ter
1tes
te1t
t1h
t1ha1
t1hi
1ti
1ti.
1ti1b
1tid
1tig
1ti1h
1tik
1ti1l
1ti1m
1tin
ting3
4ting3a
4tingan
1tip
1tir
1tis
1ti1t
1tiw
tiwa3
tiwa3l
1ti1y
t1k
t1ka2
tka2b
t1l
t1lo
t1n
t1ng
t1no1
t1nu1
to1b
1tod
1tok
3tolo
3toloh
1to1m
3tong.
1tor
to1s
to1y
t1p
t1pu2
tpu2n
1tr
1tre
1tri1
tri2l
1tro
t2sa.
1t2se1
t2se.
t2sep
t2sik
1t2so
t2soy
t1t
t1ta
1tu1a
1tu1b
tuba3
tuba3l
1tu1d2
tud2y
1tu1h
3tu3la
3tu3lan
t3uli2
t3ulit3
tu3lo.
tu3lon
tu1m
1tu1p
1tur
tu1s
1tu1t
tutu3
tutu3l
tu1y
t1y
t1ya
u1a
u1an
u1ba
uba2l
uba3la
uba3li
ubalu3
u2b1h
u2bha
u2b3is
ub3isi
u1bo
u1bu
u2b1y
u2bye
u1da
ud1s
u1du
u1d2y
ud2ya
ug3a2b
ug3abo
u3gana
u3gar
u3gar.
ug1d
ug1i
ug1n
u1go
u1gu1
u1h
u1ha
u1hi
u1hu
u1i1
u1i1t
u1ka
u2k1b
u2kbo
u1ki
uk1l
uk1p
u1kr
uk1s
uku1
u3lan.
u3las
u3lasi
u1le
uli2b
uli2k
u3lis2
u3lisy
3ulit.
ulit3u
ul1k
ul1p
u2l1t
u2lto
u3lu3g
ulu3ga
u3lugo
ulu2k
ulung3
u1ma1
uma2n3
uman3t
u2mau2
um1b
u1me
u1mi1
umi2n
um1n
u1mo
u2mp
u2mpa
um1r
u1mu1
umusu3
u2n3al
un3alo
unang3
u4nangu
una3no
u2n1d
u2nda
unda3l
unda3n
u2ndo
une2
une2r
2ungb
ung3g
ung3go
ungi2
u2ngk
1u1n1l
un1n
un1p
un1s
un1t
u3ntok
u4nungp
un1w
un1y
u3ong.
u1p
u1pa
u1po
u1pu
upu3t
upu3tu3
ur1b
ur1g
u1ri
ur1s
3usap
3usapa
usap3u
u1se
u1si
u1so
us1p
us1t
u1su
usu3no
usu3nt
u1sy
uta3yu
u1te
u1ti
u3to.
u1tr
ut1s
ut1t
u3tu3la
utu3lo
ut1y
u1u
u1u.
u1u1a
1u1u1k
u1u1l
u1u1s
u1we1
u1wu
u1ya
u1yo
uy1t
u1yu
2w.
1wa
1wa.
1wa1a
2wadr
1wa2g1
wa2ga
wa1h
1wak
wa3la
wa3lan
wa3lay
wa3li
wa3li.
wa3lo
wa3lo.
wa3lon
1wam1
1wan
2wanb
2w3a2ra
w3araw
2wart
1was
1wat
1wa1w
1way1
1we.
1we1b
wens2
we1r
1wet
we1w
1wey
1wi.
1wi1g
wi1k
1win
wis1
wi1w
1wo
1wo.
wo1w
w1s
w1si2
wsi2b
1wu
1wu.
wu1w
1ya
1ya1a
1ya1b
1yag
1yak
1yal
1yam
4yangm
4yangma
ya3no
ya3no.
1ya1p
1ya1r
1ya1s
1yat
1ya1w
1ya1y
y1b
y1ba2
yba2h
ybaha4
ybaha4y
y1bu2
ybu2h
1ye.
yem1
2yent
1yer1
yer2o
1ye1t
ye1y
y1g
y1gu2
ygu2t
y1h
y1hi2
yhi2n
1yi
1yi.
yi1y
y1l
y1le
y1n
y1na2
yna2n
1yo1e1
1yo1g
yo1l
yo1m
yona3l
yo1r
yo1t
yo1y
y1p
y1pa2
ypan2
ypa2t
y1r
y1ro1
2y1s
2y1sa
2ysa.
ysa2b
y1tu
1yu1d
1yug
1yu1h
1yu1k
yu1l
yu1m
yune2
yu2ng
4yungi
4yungiy
yu1r
3yuta3
3yuta.
yuta3y
yu1y
y1w
y1wa
}
\hyphenation{
ta-on
pa-ngu-long
pang-ulo
sa-li-tang
sa-li-ta
du-rog
nga-yon
na-ba-ba-luk-tot
ba-li-ta
bahay-bahay-an
bu-lung
bu-long
da-li
du-rug
ha-lu
ha-lo
ha-ngang
ha-nga
ka-ta-kot
ka-ta-kut
ku-lang
kum-pul
kum-pol
la-lu
la-lo
li-ku
ling-go
ling-gu
li-tu
li-to
lu-ku
ma-la-yu
ma-la-yo
ma-li
nga-yun
pa-ris
pa-res
u-lit
pu-lang
pu-lo
pu-lu
pu-net
pu-no
pu-nu
pu-rok
pu-ruk
pu-tol
pu-tul
rol-yo
rol-yu
sa-lit
sa-lo
sa-lu
sin-to
sin-tu
si-no
si-nu
su-nod
su-nud
ta-un
ta-yo
ti-pon
ti-pun
tu-loy
tu-luy
tu-ru
tu-ro
yug-to
yug-tu
labo-labo
labu-labu
labu-labo
labo-labu
ta-ta-ng-gap
nag-sama-sama
nag-tuloy-tuloy
nag-tuluy-tuloy
}
